Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2532
Federal merit standards; federal Hatch Act provisions; applicable to programs.

Whenever federal merit standards or the federal Hatch Act provisions are applicable to programs, the personnel policy board shall take such action as is necessary to assure that all personnel practices in those programs are in accordance with federal regulations, and those practices found not to be in compliance with such regulations shall not be implemented in those programs.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 16.